Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 Tennessee Veterinary Practice Act
63-12-139. Premises permits.

Any person who owns or operates any veterinary facility, including mobile clinics, or any other premises where a licensed veterinarian practices or where the practice of veterinary medicine occurs shall apply for and secure a premises permit from the board prior to the commencement of any services that would subject the provider of those services to licensure under this chapter. Any premises in operation on January 1, 1997, shall register with the board by filling out an application as required by the board.

Any premises at which veterinary services are provided and not owned or leased by a licensed veterinarian on January 1, 1997, shall be inspected prior to the opening of such premises. Upon receipt of the application and payment of the application and inspection fee established by the board, the board shall cause such premises to be inspected by an authorized agent of the board within thirty (30) days of receipt of the application. Any premises in which a licensed veterinarian operates a practice on January 1, 1997, shall be granted a temporary permit upon submission of the registration required by subsection (a), which temporary permit shall remain in effect until the premises are inspected by the board. Any premises for which a permit has been granted on or after January 1, 1997, shall be inspected by the board within sixty (60) days of any change of ownership or legal responsibility for the premises. If the board is unable to complete any inspection of the premises within the thirty- or sixty-day time periods prescribed in this subsection (b), it shall issue a temporary premises permit, which shall remain in effect until the inspection required by this section is completed.

A premises permit shall be issued if the premises meet minimum standards established by board rules as to sanitary conditions and physical plant. In lieu of the procedures identified in subsection (b), the board may issue a premises permit upon certification by the applicant that the premises have been inspected and accredited by a recognized organization, the standards of which are found by the board to meet or exceed the minimum standards established by board rules.

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(3), all veterinary facilities located in retail establishments shall have an entrance into the permitted premises that is directly on a public street or other area which adjoins the establishment, and such entrance shall be separate from the entrance primarily used by regular retail customers. For purposes of this chapter, “retail establishment” means any retail store in excess of two thousand five hundred (2,500) square feet that primarily sells goods not related to the practice of veterinary medicine; companion animal retail facilities that primarily sell goods in the categories of companion animal nutrition, food, supplies, and behavioral products; or any veterinary facility located in an enclosed shopping mall or enclosed shopping center.

Veterinary facilities located in retail establishments that were issued a premises permit prior to January 1, 2015, and that have a separate entrance used by regular retail customers shall maintain and utilize the separate entrance in order to comply with subdivision (c)(2). Veterinary facilities located in retail establishments that were issued a premises permit prior to January 1, 2015, and that do not have a separate entrance used by regular retail customers on July 1, 2016, are in compliance with subdivision (c)(2).

The costs of any inspection undertaken by the board shall be set by the board and paid in advance by the applicant, in addition to the fee established by the board for the premises permit.

Each application for a premises permit submitted by a person not licensed under this chapter shall state the name and address of the licensed veterinarian who will be responsible for the practice of veterinary medicine on the premises. The supervising veterinarian shall be licensed in Tennessee. The applicant shall also include the name or names and address or addresses of the licensee or licensees who will be onsite when the practice of veterinary medicine occurs. The applicant shall affirm that the practice of veterinary medicine shall not be provided on the premises without the physical presence of a veterinarian licensed in this state. An application for a premises permit submitted pursuant to this subsection (d) may be denied if any veterinarian submitted by the applicant has been previously disciplined by the board. The holder of a premises permit shall notify the board of any change of ownership or legal responsibility for premises for which a permit has been issued, any change as to the supervising veterinarian for the premises and any change as to the licensed veterinarian or veterinarians who will be employed to provide veterinary medical services at the premises at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of the change unless the change arises from unforeseen circumstances, in which case notice shall be given within five (5) days of the effective date of the change.

The board shall deny any application for a premises permit if the inspection reveals that the premises do not meet the minimum standards established by the board. The applicant shall pay the inspection fee for each additional reinspection required to determine whether any deficiencies found by the board have been brought into compliance with the minimum standards established by board rules and regulations as to sanitary conditions and physical plant.

Any practitioner who provides veterinary services on a house-call basis and does not maintain a veterinary facility for the receipt of patients shall not be required to secure a premises permit, but must provide for appropriate equipment and facilities as established by the board.

Any practitioner who provides veterinary services solely to agricultural animals and does not maintain a veterinary facility for the receipt of patients shall not be required to obtain a premises permit, but must provide for appropriate equipment and facilities as established by the board.

Mobile large and small animal veterinary clinics operating in more than one (1) location and examining and/or treating animals belonging to multiple clients whose animals are not permanently housed or boarded at that location shall have a premises permit for the mobile facilities that are utilized unless exempted by state or local public health officials. Such mobile clinics shall also specify the locations at which such mobile clinics will operate. Such information shall be considered as part of the application for a premises permit. Any change in the locations at which the mobile clinics will operate shall be reported to the board at least thirty (30) days in advance of the effective date of the change.

The following are exempt from this section:

A veterinary facility owned by a person, corporation or other similar organization, public or private, for-profit or not-for-profit, to treat such employer's animals;

A veterinary facility operated by an official agency of the federal or state government; and

A licensed research facility.

The board shall be authorized to employ such persons who may be required, in its discretion, to inspect premises under the jurisdiction of the board. The board shall establish a fee schedule for inspections required under this chapter. An applicant for a premises permit shall remit to the board an application fee, which shall be equal to the license fee required of licensed veterinarians. A licensed veterinarian or an applicant for licensure as a veterinarian shall not be required to submit an additional fee for a premises permit but shall be required to submit the required inspection fee, if such licensed veterinarian or applicant also submits an application for a premises permit.

The board of veterinary examiners is authorized to issue a limited waiver to the requirement for a premises permit under this section to a veterinarian who meets the following requirements:

The waiver is granted for one (1) day, once in a calendar year;

The waiver is applicable to only one (1) county and only one (1) waiver shall be granted in each county in a calendar year;

The waiver is only for livestock testing; and

The waiver is only for one (1) location, which shall be a farm.

Acts 1996, ch. 771, § 2; 2013, ch. 440, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 819, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. The term “physical plant” as used in the statute may be defined by the board of veterinary medical examiners by rule and, as the Veterinary Practice Act does not define “physical plant,” the board may apply the common understanding of the term as used in a context which is reasonably related to the ownership or operation of any veterinary facility or any other premises where a licensed veterinarian practices or where the practice of veterinary medicine occurs, OAG 02-007, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/4/02).

63-12-140. Operation without permit prohibited — Penalty.

It is an offense to knowingly operate a veterinary facility in this state without a premises permit.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor and each violation constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 1996, ch. 771, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-12-141. Euthanasia of animals — Certificate — Fees — Penalty.

The board of veterinary medical examiners, upon submission of a complete application and payment of a fee established by the board, shall issue to any animal control agency that it determines to be qualified a certificate authorizing the agency to apply to the federal drug enforcement agency, including any successor entity, for a restricted controlled substance registration certificate for the purchase, possession and use of sodium pentobarbital or other drugs as authorized by the board for administration by a certified animal euthanasia technician to euthanize injured, sick or abandoned animals. It is a Class B misdemeanor for any person or entity to use or imply that such person or entity has been granted a certificate as a certified animal control agency unless a certificate has been granted under this title.

The board, upon submission of a complete application and payment of a fee established by the board, shall issue to any person who it determines to be qualified a certificate for such person to function as a certified animal euthanasia technician. It is a Class B misdemeanor for any person or entity to use or imply that such person or entity has been granted a certificate as a certified animal euthanasia technician unless a certificate has been granted under this title.

Euthanasia of animals. Euthanasia of animals in a certified animal control agency may only be performed by a licensed veterinarian, including a licensed veterinary technician employed by and functioning under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian or a certified animal euthanasia technician as provided by law. A certified animal control agency that employs a certified animal euthanasia technician may purchase, possess and administer sodium pentobarbital or such other drug that the board may approve for the euthanasia of animals. Sodium pentobarbital and such other drugs approved by the board shall be the only drugs used for the euthanasia of animals in a certified animal control agency.

Renewal of Certification. Certified animal control agencies and certified animal euthanasia technicians shall be required to renew their certificates at such intervals, upon such conditions and upon the payment of such fees as may be established by the board.

Acts 1997, ch. 106, § 1; 1999, ch. 375, § 6.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-12-142. Immunity for certain emergency treatment.

Any licensed veterinarian or ancillary veterinary personnel employed by and working under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian who, in good faith, at such person's own initiative, renders emergency treatment to an ill or injured animal gratuitously and without making charge for such treatment is not liable to the owner of the animal for any civil damages arising from the treatment provided to the animal except in cases of gross negligence. If the licensed veterinarian or ancillary veterinary personnel acting under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian performs euthanasia on an animal, it is presumed that it was a humane act necessary to relieve pain and suffering.

Acts 1997, ch. 484, § 1.

63-12-143. Cost of prosecution.

The board shall promulgate rules governing the assessment of costs against a licensee or other person found by the board to have violated any provision of this chapter. The costs assessed by the board may include only those costs directly related to the prosecution of the charges against the licensee or other person, including investigatory costs where appropriate. The board shall determine the appropriate amount of costs, if any, to be assessed in a contested case. These costs shall be reasonable and proportionate in light of the violation committed by the licensee or other person.

Acts 1999, ch. 436, § 3.

Cross-References. Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

63-12-144. Certificate authorizing chemical capture of animals by certified animal chemical capture technicians — Protocol — Offense — Certification course.

The board of veterinary medical examiners, upon submission of a complete application and payment of a fee established by the board, shall issue to any governmental animal control agency that the board determines to be qualified and that has a valid premises permit issued by the board a certificate authorizing chemical capture of animals under this section by certified animal chemical capture technicians.

The agencies shall submit, as part of the application, a written protocol for chemical capture of animals by certified animal chemical capture technicians to the board for approval. The protocol shall include, at a minimum:

The procedure for removing the dart from a captured animal;

First aid care of the dart wound;

The procedure for providing veterinary care to the animal immediately upon capture;

The appropriate location and handling of the animal during recovery from anesthesia; and

The supervisory structure regarding who makes the final decision to proceed with the chemical capture of an animal.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any person or entity to engage in the chemical capture of animals or imply that the person or entity has been granted a certificate as a certified animal control agency with a premises permit unless the certificate and permit have been granted under this title.

The board, upon submission of a complete application and payment of a fee established by the board, shall issue to any person who the board determines to be qualified a certificate for the person to function as a certified animal chemical capture technician. Applicants shall be required to have successfully completed a sixteen-hour chemical immobilization certification course. The course must be approved by the board, and the curriculum of the course shall include pharmacology, proper administration, recordkeeping, chemical capture technology, animal behavior, postimmobilization procedures, proper public and personnel safety, and marksmanship training.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any person to chemically capture animals or imply that the person has been granted a certificate as a certified animal chemical capture technician unless a certificate has been granted under this title.

The chemical capture of dogs and cats, as defined in § 44-17-601, shall only be performed by a licensed veterinarian, a licensed veterinary technician employed by and functioning under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian or a certified animal chemical capture technician as provided by law. Telazol and such other drugs that the board may approve shall be the only drugs used for the chemical capture of dogs and cats by a certified animal chemical capture technician.

Tranquilizer guns shall be used for the humane chemical capture of dogs and cats. Any such tranquilizer gun shall have the capability to track the darts it shoots and shall be well maintained and kept in a high state of repair at all times.

Certified animal control agencies and certified animal chemical capture technicians shall be required to renew their certificates at such intervals, upon such conditions and upon the payment of such fees as may be established by the board.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to limit in any way the practice of a licensed veterinarian as provided by law.

Acts 2008, ch. 805, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch 805, § 3 provided that the board of veterinary medical examiners is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-Reference. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-12-145. Preemption of regulation of veterinarian medicine — Local regulation.

The general assembly intends by this chapter, other provisions of the Tennessee Code Annotated and any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter and the Tennessee Code Annotated to occupy and preempt the entire field of legislation concerning the regulation of the practice of veterinary medicine, including, but not limited to, the regulation of any act or procedure utilized within the practice of veterinary medicine.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a municipality, metropolitan government or county may regulate the time and place of the business operations of a person or facility holding a license or certificate under this chapter; provided, that the regulation does not conflict with state laws or regulations governing the practice of veterinary medicine.

Acts 2009, ch. 149, § 1.